Nebraska, session 109, LB223.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB223 LB223
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 20-139, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-139 The Nebraska Fair Housing Act and sections 20-123, 20-124,
and 20-132 to 20-143 shall be administered by the Equal Opportunity
Commission, except that the State Fire Marshal shall administer the act
and sections as they relate to accessibility standards and specifications
set forth in sections 81-5,147 and 81-5,148. The county attorneys are
granted the authority to enforce such act and sections 20-123, 20-124,
and 20-132 to 20-143 and shall possess the same powers and duties with
respect thereto as the commission. If a complaint is filed with the
county attorney, the commission shall be notified. Powers granted to and
duties imposed upon the commission pursuant to such act and sections
shall be in addition to the provisions of the Nebraska Fair Employment
Practice Act and shall not be construed to amend or restrict those
provisions. In carrying out the Nebraska Fair Housing Act and sections
20-123, 20-124, and 20-132 to 20-143, the commission shall have the power
to:
(1) Seek to eliminate and prevent discrimination in places of public
accommodation because of race, color, sex, religion, national origin,
familial status as defined in section 20-311, disability as defined in
section 20-308.01, or ancestry;
(2) Effectuate the purposes of sections 20-132 to 20-143 by
conference, conciliation, and persuasion so that persons may be
guaranteed their civil rights and goodwill may be fostered;
(3) Formulate policies to effectuate the purposes of sections 20-132
to 20-143 and make recommendations to agencies and officers of the state
or local subdivisions of government in aid of such policies and purposes;
(4) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the
powers granted by the Nebraska Fair Housing Act and sections 20-123,
20-124, and 20-132 to 20-143, subject to the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act. The commission shall, not later than one
-2-

LB223 LB223
2025 2025
hundred eighty days after September 6, 1991, issue draft rules and
regulations to implement subsection (3) of section 20-336, which
regulations may incorporate regulations of the Department of Housing and
Urban Development as applicable;
(5) Designate one or more members of the commission or a member of
the commission staff to conduct investigations of any complaint alleging
discrimination because of race, color, sex, religion, national origin,
familial status, disability, or ancestry, or lawful source of income,
attempt to resolve such complaint by conference, conciliation, and
persuasion, and conduct such conciliation meetings and conferences as are
deemed necessary to resolve a particular complaint, which meetings shall
be held in the county in which the complaint arose;
(6) Determine that probable cause exists for crediting the
allegations of a complaint;
(7) Determine that a complaint cannot be resolved by conference,
conciliation, or persuasion, such determination to be made only at a
meeting where a quorum is present;
(8) Dismiss a complaint when it is determined there is not probable
cause to credit the allegations;
(9) Hold hearings, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance,
administer oaths, take the testimony of any person under oath, and in
connection therewith require for examination any books or papers relating
to any matter under investigation or in question before the commission;
and
(10) Issue publications and the results of studies and research
which will tend to promote goodwill and minimize or eliminate
discrimination because of race, color, sex, religion, national origin,
familial status, disability, or ancestry, or lawful source of income.
Sec. 2. Section 20-301, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-301 Sections 20-301 to 20-344 and section 4 of this act shall be
-3-

LB223 LB223
2025 2025
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Fair Housing Act.
Sec. 3. Section 20-303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-303 For purposes of the Nebraska Fair Housing Act, the
definitions found in sections 20-304 to 20-317 and section 4 of this act
shall be used.
Sec. 4. Lawful source of income includes, but is not limited to:
(1) Income derived from social security, child support, foster care
subsidies, alimony, or veterans benefits;
(2) Any form of federal, state, or local public general assistance
or housing assistance whether or not such source of income or credit is
paid directly, indirectly, or on behalf of a renter or buyer of housing
or is paid or attributed directly to a landlord, including, but not
limited to, vouchers given as part of the federal low-income housing
assistance authorized under 42 U.S.C. 1437f;
(3) Any form of housing assistance payment or credit; and
(4) Any other form of lawful income.
Sec. 5. Section 20-317, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-317 Restrictive covenant shall mean any specification limiting
the transfer, rental, or lease of any housing because of race, creed,
religion, color, national origin, sex, disability, familial status, or
ancestry, or lawful source of income.
Sec. 6. Section 20-318, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-318 (1) Except as exempted by section 20-322, it shall be
unlawful to:
(a) (1) Refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide
offer, refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental of or otherwise make
unavailable or deny, refuse to show, or refuse to receive and transmit an
offer for a dwelling to any person because of race, color, religion,
-4-

LB223 LB223
2025 2025
national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or lawful source of
income or because of any requirement of any federal, state, or local
public general assistance or housing assistance program;
(b) (2) Discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or
privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling or in the provision of
services or facilities in connection therewith because of race, color,
religion, national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or lawful
source of income or because of any requirement of any federal, state, or
local public general assistance or housing assistance program;
(c) (3) Make, print, publish, or cause to be made, printed, or
published any notice, statement, or advertisement with respect to the
sale or rental of a dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation,
or discrimination based on race, color, religion, national origin,
disability, familial status, or sex , or lawful source of income or based
on any requirement of any federal, state, or local public general
assistance or housing assistance program or that indicates an intention
to make any such preference, limitation, or discrimination;
(d) (4) Represent to any person because of race, color, religion,
national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or lawful source of
income or because of any requirement of any federal, state, or local
public general assistance or housing assistance program, that any
dwelling is not available for inspection, sale, or rental when such
dwelling is in fact so available;
(e) (5) Cause to be made any written or oral inquiry or record
concerning the race, color, religion, national origin, disability,
familial status, or sex, or lawful source of income of a person seeking
to purchase, rent, or lease any housing or concerning any requirement of
any federal, state, or local public general assistance or housing
assistance program with respect to such person;
(f) (6) Include in any transfer, sale, rental, or lease of housing
any restrictive covenants or honor or exercise or attempt to honor or
-5-

LB223 LB223
2025 2025
exercise any restrictive covenant pertaining to housing;
(g) (7) Discharge or demote an employee or agent or discriminate in
the compensation of such employee or agent because of such employee's or
agent's compliance with the Nebraska Fair Housing Act; and
(h) (8) Induce or attempt to induce, for profit, any person to sell
or rent any dwelling by representations regarding the entry or
prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a
particular race, color, religion, national origin, disability, familial
status, or sex, or lawful source of income.
(2) Nothing in the Nebraska Fair Housing Act shall prohibit
otherwise nondiscriminatory conduct intended to benefit recipients of
public assistance, such as providing housing limited to recipients of
public assistance; providing favorable conditions of loans, leases,
mortgages, or contracts; or otherwise offering benefits that are limited
to recipients of public assistance.
Sec. 7. Section 20-320, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-320 (1) It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose
business includes engaging in transactions related to residential real
estate to discriminate against any person in making available such a
transaction or in the terms or conditions of such a transaction because
of race, color, religion, sex, disability, familial status, or national
origin, or lawful source of income.
(2) For purposes of this section, transaction related to residential
real estate shall mean any of the following:
(a) The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial
assistance:
(i) For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or
maintaining a dwelling; or
(ii) Secured by residential real estate; or
(b) The selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real
-6-

LB223 LB223
2025 2025
property.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person engaged in the
business of furnishing appraisals of real property from taking into
consideration factors other than race, color, religion, national origin,
sex, disability, or familial status, or lawful source of income.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prohibit otherwise
nondiscriminatory conduct intended to benefit recipients of public
assistance, such as providing housing limited to recipients of public
assistance; providing favorable conditions of loans, leases, mortgages,
or contracts; or otherwise offering benefits that are limited to
recipients of public assistance.
Sec. 8. Section 20-321, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-321 It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to, or
membership or participation in, any multiple listing service, real estate
brokers organization, or other service, organization, or facility
relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings or to
discriminate against any person in the terms or conditions of such
access, membership, or participation on account of race, color, religion,
national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or lawful source of
income.
Sec. 9. Section 20-322, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-322 (1) Nothing in the Nebraska Fair Housing Act shall prohibit a
religious organization, association, or society or any nonprofit
institution or organization operated, supervised, or controlled by or in
conjunction with a religious organization, association, or society from
limiting the sale, rental, or occupancy of a dwelling which it owns or
operates for other than commercial purposes to persons of the same
religion or from giving preferences to such persons unless membership in
such religion is restricted on account of race, color, national origin,
-7-

LB223 LB223
2025 2025
disability, familial status, or sex, or lawful source of income.
(2) Nothing in the act shall prohibit a private club not in fact
open to the public, which as an incident to its primary purpose or
purposes provides lodgings which it owns or operates for other than
commercial purposes, from limiting the rental or occupancy of such
lodging to its members or from giving preference to its members.
(3) Nothing in the act shall prohibit or limit the right of any
person or his or her authorized representative to refuse to rent a room
or rooms in his or her own home for any reason or for no reason or to
change tenants in his or her own home as often as desired, except that
this exception shall not apply to any person who makes available for
rental or occupancy more than four sleeping rooms to a person or family
within his or her own home.
(4)(a) Nothing in the act shall limit the applicability of any
reasonable local restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants
permitted to occupy a dwelling, and nothing in the act regarding familial
status shall apply with respect to housing for older persons.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, housing for older persons shall
mean housing:
(i) Provided under any state program that the commission determines
is specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons as
defined in the program;
(ii) Intended for and solely occupied by persons sixty-two years of
age or older; or
(iii) Intended and operated for occupancy by at least one person
fifty-five years of age or older per unit. In determining whether housing
qualifies as housing for older persons under this subdivision, the
commission shall develop regulations which require at least the following
factors:
(A) The existence of significant facilities and services
specifically designed to meet the physical or social needs of older
-8-

LB223 LB223
2025 2025
persons or, if the provision of such facilities and services is not
practicable, that such housing is necessary to provide important housing
opportunities for older persons;
(B) That at least eighty percent of the units are occupied by at
least one person fifty-five years of age or older per unit; and
(C) The publication of and adherence to policies and procedures
which demonstrate an intent by the owner or manager to provide housing
for persons fifty-five years of age or older.
(c) Housing shall not fail to meet the requirements for housing for
older persons by reason of:
(i) Persons residing in the housing as of September 6, 1991, who do
not meet the age requirements of subdivision (b)(ii) or (iii) of this
subsection if succeeding occupants of the housing meet the age
requirements; or
(ii) Unoccupied units if the units are reserved for occupancy by
persons who meet the age requirements.
(5) Nothing in the act shall prohibit conduct against a person
because such person has been convicted by any court of competent
jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a controlled
substance as defined in section 28-401.
Sec. 10. Section 20-325, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-325 The commission shall:
(1) Make studies with respect to the nature and extent of
discriminatory housing practices in representative urban, suburban, and
rural communities throughout the state;
(2) Publish and disseminate reports, recommendations, and
information derived from such studies, including an annual report to the
Legislature to be submitted electronically:
(a) Specifying the nature and extent of progress made statewide in
eliminating discriminatory housing practices and furthering the purposes
-9-

LB223 LB223
2025 2025
of the Nebraska Fair Housing Act, obstacles remaining to achieving equal
housing opportunity, and recommendations for further legislative or
executive action; and
(b) Containing tabulations of the number of instances and the
reasons therefor in the preceding year in which:
(i) Investigations have not been completed as required by
subdivision (1)(b) of section 20-326;
(ii) Determinations have not been made within the time specified in
section 20-333; and
(iii) Hearings have not been commenced or findings and conclusions
have not been made as required by section 20-337;
(3) Cooperate with and render technical assistance to state, local,
and other public or private agencies, organizations, and institutions
which are formulating or carrying on programs to prevent or eliminate
discriminatory housing practices;
(4) Electronically submit an annual report to the Legislature and
make available to the public data on the age, race, color, religion,
national origin, disability, familial status, and sex, and lawful source
of income of persons and households who are applicants for, participants
in, or beneficiaries or potential beneficiaries of programs administered
by the commission. In order to develop the data to be included and made
available to the public under this subdivision, the commission shall,
without regard to any other provision of law, collect such information
relating to those characteristics as the commission determines to be
necessary or appropriate;
(5) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, subject to the
approval of the members of the commission, regarding the investigative
and conciliation process that provide for testing standards, fundamental
due process, and notice to the parties of their rights and
responsibilities; and
(6) Have authority to enter into agreements with the United States
-10-

LB223 LB223
2025 2025
Department of Housing and Urban Development in cooperative agreements
under the Fair Housing Assistance Program. The commission shall further
have the authority to enter into agreements with testing organizations to
assist in investigative activities. The commission shall not enter into
any agreements under which compensation to the testing organization is
partially or wholly based on the number of conciliations, settlements,
and reasonable cause determinations.
Sec. 11. Original sections 20-139, 20-301, 20-303, 20-317, 20-318,
20-320, 20-321, 20-322, and 20-325, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
are repealed.
-11-